Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 3. Other Offenses

§ 3481.
Repealed. 2017, No. 16, § 1.

§ 3482.
Furnishing information to enemy.

A person shall not furnish, nor attempt to furnish, to a government at war with or threatening war on the United States, or to a citizen of such government or to a person whom he or she has reason to believe will furnish or attempt to furnish to such government or citizen, information relative to:

the location, construction, or condition of a military camp, fort, armory, arsenal, or building in which munitions of war are being manufactured or are stored;

the proposed location of such camp, fort, armory, arsenal, or building;

the location or condition or proposed location of a bridge, road, car, boat, canal, dockyard, telephone or telegraph line or equipment, wireless station or equipment, railway or railway equipment, property of a corporation subject to the supervision of the Public Utility Commission;

the topography of the State or a part thereof;

the number, character, condition, or location of the National Guard or the land or naval forces of the United States in this State.

A person who violates a subdivision of subsection (a) of this section shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years.

HISTORY:

Amended 1959, No. 329 (Adj. Sess.), § 39; 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 3483.
Injuries to certain property; penalty.

While the United States is at war or threatened with war, a person shall not:

injure or attempt or conspire, or have in his or her possession any tool, explosive, or means with intent to use the same or for some one else to use, to injure a bridge, road, car, boat, canal, dockyard, telephone or telegraph line or equipment, wireless station or equipment, railway or highway equipment, road or railway making equipment, property, or a corporation subject to the supervision of the Public Utility Commission, property designed for use by the State or a municipality or railway, telephone, or telegraph company, property of a person, copartnership, or corporation engaged in or about to engage in making munitions of war or property to become the property of the State, or a building belonging to the State or a municipality or to a railway, telephone, or telegraph company or to a corporation subject to the supervision of the Public Utility Commission; or

pollute or place any poisonous substance in any water liable to be used by a person or domestic animal.

A person who violates a subdivision of subsection (a) of this section shall be imprisoned not more than 20 years.

HISTORY:

Amended 1959, No. 329 (Adj. Sess.), § 39; 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 3484.
Concerted action by three or more.

If three or more persons, acting in concert, with force and violence, attempt to kill, maim, or wound a person, or to rob a person, corporation, or community of money or other property, or to burn, blow up, or otherwise destroy a bank building, store, factory, dwelling house, or other building or depository of property, or a railway car or engine, or a steamboat, vessel, or other watercraft, finished or unfinished, for use in navigable waters, or property of a corporation subject to the supervision of the Public Utility Commission, each person so offending shall suffer the penalty of death.
The provisions of this section shall be in force only while the United States is at war or threatened with war.

HISTORY:

Amended 1959, No. 329 (Adj. Sess.), § 39, eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 3485.
Penalty when offense is treason.

A person who commits an offense punishable under one of sections 3482-3485 of this title, and such offense amounts to treason, shall be punished for treason in lieu of the penalty prescribed in such section.

HISTORY:

Amended 2019, No. 77, § 16, eff. June 19, 2019.